apertium-ces-hbs.ces.dix
    <pardef n="used/nout__vblex"> <!-- fmorph noutd --> 
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nout</l>
        <r>nout<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>n</l>
        <r>nout<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__čti"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nul</l>
        <r>nout<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/></r>
      </p>
      <par n="BASE__napsal"/> 
    </e>
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>l</l>
        <r>nout<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/></r>
      </p>
      <par n="BASE__napsal"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>n</l>
        <r>nout<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__kryji"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nuv</l>
        <r>nout<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__měv"/> 
    </e>
    <e c="check">
      <p>
        <l>není</l>
        <r>nout<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__úterý"/> 
    </e>
    <e c="check">
      <p>
        <l>nen</l>
        <r>nout<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adj"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__nov/ý"/> 
    </e>
    <e c="check">
      <p>
        <l>an</l>
        <r>nout<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="impers"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__četl"/> 
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="věř/it__vblex"> <!-- fmorph iten -->
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>it</l>
        <r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ení</l>
        <r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__úterý"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>il</l>
        <r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__četl"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__udrž"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__udržím"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__plavajíce"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>en</l>
        <r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__chtěn"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>íc</l>
        <r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adj"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__další"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>en</l>
        <r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adj"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__nov/ý"/> 
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="zruš/it__vblex"> <!-- fmorph ited -->
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>it</l>
        <r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>iv</l>
        <r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__měv"/> 
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ení</l>
        <r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__úterý"/> 
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>il</l>
        <r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__četl"/> 
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__udrž"/> 
    </e>



    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ím</l>
        <r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>ímť</l>
        <r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>íš</l>
        <r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>íšť</l>
        <r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>í</l>
        <r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>íť</l>
        <r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>íme</l>
        <r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>ímeť</l>
        <r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>íte</l>
        <r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>íteť</l>
        <r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>í</l>
        <r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>íť</l>
        <r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>



    <e>
      <p>
        <l>en</l>
        <r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adj"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__nov/ý"/> 
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>en</l>
        <r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="impers"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__četl"/> 
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="poho/stit__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>stit</l>
        <r>stit<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>štění</l>
        <r>stit<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__úterý"/> 
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>st</l>
        <r>stit<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__pohostím"/> 
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>st</l>
        <r>stit<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__čti"/> 
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>štěn</l>
        <r>stit<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adj"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__nov/ý"/> 
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>šten</l>
        <r>stit<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="impers"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__četl"/> 
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="vyv/ážit__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ážit</l>
        <r>ážit<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ážení</l>
        <r>ážit<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__úterý"/> 
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>áž</l>
        <r>ážit<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__pohostím"/> 
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>áž</l>
        <r>ážit<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__udrž"/> 
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ážěn</l>
        <r>ážit<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adj"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__nov/ý"/> 
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ážen</l>
        <r>ážit<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="impers"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__četl"/> 
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <e lm="nakrmit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>nakrm</i><par n="zruš/it__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="osvěžit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>osvěž</i><par n="zruš/it__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pohostit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>poho</i><par n="poho/stit__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="souhlasit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>souhlas</i><par n="věř/it__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vyvážit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>vyv</i><par n="vyv/ážit__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zajistit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>zaji</i><par n="poho/stit__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zjednodušit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>zjednoduš</i><par n="zruš/it__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zrušit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>zruš</i><par n="zruš/it__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="přeložit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>přelož</i><par n="zruš/it__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="věřit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>věř</i><par n="věř/it__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="naměřit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>naměř</i><par n="zruš/it__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="narušit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>naruš</i><par n="zruš/it__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="naučit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>nauč</i><par n="zruš/it__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="odpojit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>odpoj</i><par n="zruš/it__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="naměřit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>naměř</i><par n="zruš/it__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="odročit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>odroč</i><par n="zruš/it__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="odnaučit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>odnauč</i><par n="zruš/it__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="osušit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>osuš</i><par n="zruš/it__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="označit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>označ</i><par n="zruš/it__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="připojit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>připoj</i><par n="zruš/it__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ponořit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>ponoř</i><par n="zruš/it__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pokořit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>pokoř</i><par n="zruš/it__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="propojit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>propoj</i><par n="zruš/it__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="půjčit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>půjč</i><par n="zruš/it__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="překročit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>překroč</i><par n="zruš/it__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="přeskočit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>přeskoč</i><par n="zruš/it__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="odpojit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>odpoj</i><par n="zruš/it__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zvážit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>zv</i><par n="vyv/ážit__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ztišit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>ztiš</i><par n="zruš/it__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zaměřit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>zaměř</i><par n="zruš/it__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sbalit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>sbal</i><par n="zruš/it__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="spařit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>spař</i><par n="zruš/it__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zpeněžit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>zpeněž</i><par n="zruš/it__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="uvařit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>uvař</i><par n="zruš/it__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="utržit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>utrž</i><par n="zruš/it__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="uvěřit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>uvěř</i><par n="zruš/it__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ověřit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>ověř</i><par n="zruš/it__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rozčilit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>rozčil</i><par n="zruš/it__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="povolit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>povol</i><par n="zruš/it__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vložit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>vlož</i><par n="zruš/it__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vynořit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>vynoř</i><par n="zruš/it__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vypařit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>vypař</i><par n="zruš/it__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vyplašit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>vyplaš</i><par n="zruš/it__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="propůjčit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>propůjč</i><par n="zruš/it__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vystrašit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>vystraš</i><par n="zruš/it__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vyznačit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>vyznač</i><par n="zruš/it__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zaútočit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>zaútoč</i><par n="zruš/it__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zabezpečit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>zabezpeč</i><par n="zruš/it__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zamračit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>zamrač</i><par n="zruš/it__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zadlužit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>zadluž</i><par n="zruš/it__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zaručit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>zaruč</i><par n="zruš/it__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="přiložit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>přilož</i><par n="zruš/it__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="připojit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>připoj</i><par n="zruš/it__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ponořit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>ponoř</i><par n="zruš/it__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="uložit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>ulož</i><par n="zruš/it__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zatarasit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>zataras</i><par n="zruš/it__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="naměřit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>naměř</i><par n="zruš/it__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ověřit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>ověř</i><par n="zruš/it__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="usednout"><par n="v_neg"/><i>used</i><par n="used/nout__vblex"/></e>
